Mississippi, session 2026, SB2095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law, the odor of marijuana alone shall not provide a law enforcement officer with probable cause to conduct a warrantless search of a motor vehicle, home or other private property. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.